Mississippi, session 2026, HB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Domestic Violence Transparency Act". SECTION 2.  For purposes of this act, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Conviction" means a judgment entered by a Mississippi court upon a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, or a finding of guilt by a jury or the court, notwithstanding any pending appeal or habeas corpus proceeding arising from the judgment.  "Conviction" includes a disposition by nonadjudication under Section 99-15-26. (b) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety. (c) "Offender" means a person with more than one (1) conviction for a registrable offense. (d)  "Registrable offense" means a crime chargeable under Sections 99-3-7, or chargeable as "Domestic Violence" as defined by Section 93-21-125. (e) "Registrant" means a person who is registered in compliance with this act. SECTION 3.  (1) The Department of Public Safety shall create and post a publicly accessible registry that lists qualifying information for any person convicted one (1) or more times of domestic violence as defined by this act. (2)  (a)  The list shall include the offender's full legal name, any aliases by which the offender is or has been known, including any online or Internet identifiers, the offender's date of birth and a photograph of the offender. (b)  The list shall not include the offender's social security number, driver's license number, any other state or federal identification number, physical address or telephone numbers. (3)  (a)  The department shall remove all identifying information of a registrant in this act upon the occurrence of: (i)  Five (5) years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the offender has no more than one (1) prior conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; (ii) Seven (7) years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the registrant has no more than two (2) prior convictions for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; (iii) Ten (10) years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the registrant has no more than three (3) prior convictions for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; or (iv) Twenty (20) years after the date of the most recent conviction for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the offender has four (4) or more prior convictions for an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim; and (b)  All fines, penalties and any restitution imposed on the offender are paid in full. (4)  Any registered person may petition the department to be removed from the list after the satisfaction of the conditions of this subsection.  Upon receipt and confirmation of a true and correct petition, the department shall remove the offender from the registry. SECTION 4. (1)  The department shall maintain the registry on the Internet, which shall contain a disclaimer informing the public that: (a)  The information contained on the website is obtained from public records, and the department does not guarantee the website's accuracy or completeness; (b)  The list only includes persons convicted in Mississippi state courts of domestic violence crimes.  Persons who are convicted in any federal court, or who are convicted of a crime other than a registrable offense will not appear on the registry. (2)  The department and any individual or entity acting at the request or upon the direction of the department are immune from civil liability for damages arising from reporting information under this act and will be presumed to have acted in good faith in performing its duties under this chapter. SECTION 5.  (1) Upon the entry of any order sentencing the offender to probation or parole or upon the date of release of the offender from the physical custody of the responsible agency, the applicable court clerk shall check applicable records to determine whether the offender has been convicted of any other crime of domestic violence as defined by this act.  If the offender has  one or more prior convictions, the applicable court clerk shall forward a copy of the conviction, sentencing order, name, sex, date of birth and photograph of the offender to the Department of Public Safety. (2)  An offender required to register on the basis of a conviction entered shall register with the Department of Public Safety and pay a registration fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) within thirty (30) business days of the date of judgment unless the offender is immediately confined or committed, in which case the offender shall register before release in accordance with the procedures established by the department. SECTION 6.  (1) The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law to effectuate the purposes of this act. (2) The provisions of this act shall only apply to persons convicted of an offense committed against a domestic abuse victim that occurred on or after July 1, 2026; provided, however, that a prior conviction is not required to occur on or after July 1, 2026. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.